Illinois, session 104th, HB2477.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 15-135 and 15-198 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/15-135)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 15-135)7    Sec. 15-135. Retirement annuities; conditions. 8    (a) This subsection (a) applies only to a Tier 1 member. A 9participant who retires in one of the following specified 10years with the specified amount of service is entitled to a 11retirement annuity at any age under the retirement program 12applicable to the participant:13        35 years if retirement is in 1997 or before;14        34 years if retirement is in 1998;15        33 years if retirement is in 1999;16        32 years if retirement is in 2000;17        31 years if retirement is in 2001;18        30 years if retirement is in 2002 or later.19    A participant with 8 or more years of service after 20September 1, 1941, is entitled to a retirement annuity on or 21after attainment of age 55.22    A participant with at least 5 but less than 8 years of 23service after September 1, 1941, is entitled to a retirement   HB2477- 2 -LRB104 08598 RPS 18650 b1annuity on or after attainment of age 62.2    A participant who has at least 25 years of service in this 3system as a police officer or firefighter is entitled to a 4retirement annuity on or after the attainment of age 50, if 5Rule 4 of Section 15-136 is applicable to the participant.6    (a-5) A Tier 2 member is entitled to a retirement annuity 7upon written application if he or she has attained age 67 and 8has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 9eligible under the requirements of this Article. A Tier 2 10member who has attained age 62 and has at least 10 years of 11service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 12requirements of this Article may elect to receive the lower 13retirement annuity provided in subsection (b-5) of Section 1415-136 of this Article. 15    (a-10) A Tier 2 member who has at least 20 years of service 16in this system as a police officer or firefighter is entitled 17to a retirement annuity upon written application on or after 18the attainment of age 60 if Rule 4 of Section 15-136 is 19applicable to the participant. A Tier 2 member who has at least 2020 years of service in this system as a police officer is 21entitled to a retirement annuity upon written application on 22or after the attainment of age 55 if Rule 4 of Section 15-136 23is applicable to the participant. The changes made to this 24subsection by this amendatory Act of the 101st General 25Assembly apply retroactively to January 1, 2011. 26    (b) The annuity payment period shall begin on the date   HB2477- 3 -LRB104 08598 RPS 18650 b1specified by the participant or the recipient of a disability 2retirement annuity submitting a written application. For a 3participant, the date on which the annuity payment period 4begins shall not be prior to termination of employment or more 5than one year before the application is received by the board; 6however, if the participant is not an employee of an employer 7participating in this System or in a participating system as 8defined in Article 20 of this Code on April 1 of the calendar 9year next following the calendar year in which the participant 10attains the age specified under Section 401(a)(9) of the 11Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, the annuity payment 12period shall begin on that date regardless of whether an 13application has been filed. For a recipient of a disability 14retirement annuity, the date on which the annuity payment 15period begins shall not be prior to the discontinuation of the 16disability retirement annuity under Section 15-153.2. 17    (c) An annuity is not payable if the amount provided under 18Section 15-136 is less than $10 per month.19(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-210, eff. 7-30-21.) 20    (40 ILCS 5/15-198)21    Sec. 15-198. Application and expiration of new benefit 22increases.23    (a) As used in this Section, "new benefit increase" means 24an increase in the amount of any benefit provided under this 25Article, or an expansion of the conditions of eligibility for   HB2477- 4 -LRB104 08598 RPS 18650 b1any benefit under this Article, that results from an amendment 2to this Code that takes effect after June 1, 2005 (the 3effective date of Public Act 94-4). "New benefit increase", 4however, does not include any benefit increase resulting from 5the changes made to Article 1 or this Article by Public Act 6100-23, Public Act 100-587, Public Act 100-769, Public Act 7101-10, Public Act 101-610, Public Act 102-16, Public Act 8103-80, or Public Act 103-548, or this amendatory Act of the 9104th General Assembly.10    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code or 11any subsequent amendment to this Code, every new benefit 12increase is subject to this Section and shall be deemed to be 13granted only in conformance with and contingent upon 14compliance with the provisions of this Section. 15    (c) The Public Act enacting a new benefit increase must 16identify and provide for payment to the System of additional 17funding at least sufficient to fund the resulting annual 18increase in cost to the System as it accrues.19    Every new benefit increase is contingent upon the General 20Assembly providing the additional funding required under this 21subsection. The Commission on Government Forecasting and 22Accountability shall analyze whether adequate additional 23funding has been provided for the new benefit increase and 24shall report its analysis to the Public Pension Division of 25the Department of Insurance. A new benefit increase created by 26a Public Act that does not include the additional funding   HB2477- 5 -LRB104 08598 RPS 18650 b1required under this subsection is null and void. If the Public 2Pension Division determines that the additional funding 3provided for a new benefit increase under this subsection is 4or has become inadequate, it may so certify to the Governor and 5the State Comptroller and, in the absence of corrective action 6by the General Assembly, the new benefit increase shall expire 7at the end of the fiscal year in which the certification is 8made. 9    (d) Every new benefit increase shall expire 5 years after 10its effective date or on such earlier date as may be specified 11in the language enacting the new benefit increase or provided 12under subsection (c). This does not prevent the General 13Assembly from extending or re-creating a new benefit increase 14by law.15    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the language creating 16the new benefit increase, a new benefit increase that expires 17under this Section continues to apply to persons who applied 18and qualified for the affected benefit while the new benefit 19increase was in effect and to the affected beneficiaries and 20alternate payees of such persons, but does not apply to any 21other person, including, without limitation, a person who 22continues in service after the expiration date and did not 23apply and qualify for the affected benefit while the new 24benefit increase was in effect.25(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-80, eff. 6-9-23; 26103-548, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB2477- 6 -LRB104 08598 RPS 18650 b1    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 2Section 8.49 as follows: 3    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)4    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 58 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 6the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly.